Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1605
Rules and regulations.

The Secretary of State shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement sections 52-1601 to 52-1605.

Laws 1988, LB 987, § 5.